South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S277.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 15-39-410 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 15-39-410. The judge may order any property of the judgment debtor, not exempt from execution, in the hands either of himself or any other person or due to the judgment debtor, to be applied toward the satisfaction of the judgment, except that seventy-five percent of the earnings of the debtor for his personal services cannot be so applied, and the earnings of the judgment debtor for his personal services to be withheld may not exceed the limits set forth by the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1673. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----